Hawaii statutes.
[§572B-4.5] Rights held by
reciprocal beneficiaries who enter into a civil union. (a) If two
reciprocal beneficiaries enter into a civil union with each other, the rights,
benefits, protections, or responsibilities created by the reciprocal
beneficiary relationship shall be continuous through the civil union and deemed
to have accrued as of the first date these rights existed under the reciprocal
beneficiary relationship; provided that the individuals terminated their
reciprocal beneficiary relationship simultaneously with their entry into a
civil union, or within the ninety days immediately preceding their entry into a
civil union.

(b) Any rights, benefits, protections, or
responsibilities created by the solemnization of a civil union that were not included
within a reciprocal beneficiary relationship shall be recognized as of the date
the civil union was solemnized.

(c) Property held in tenancy by the entirety
shall be subject to section 509-3. [L 2012, c 267, pt of §3]

Note

Section retroactive to January 1, 2012. L 2012, c 267, §20.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next